Utah statutes.
78A-2-107.   Court administrator -- Powers, duties, and responsibilities.

Under the general supervision of the presiding officer of the Judicial Council, and within the policies established by the council, the administrator shall:

(1)  organize and administer all of the nonjudicial activities of the courts;

(2)  assign, supervise, and direct the work of the nonjudicial officers of the courts;

(3)  implement the standards, policies, and rules established by the council;

(4)  formulate and administer a system of personnel administration, including in-service training programs;

(5)  prepare and administer the state judicial budget, fiscal, accounting, and procurement activities for the operation of the courts of record, and assist justices' courts in their budgetary, fiscal, and accounting procedures;

(6)  conduct studies of the business of the courts, including the preparation of recommendations and reports relating to them;

(7)  develop uniform procedures for the management of court business, including the management of court calendars;

(8)  maintain liaison with the governmental and other public and private groups having an interest in the administration of the courts;

(9)  establish uniform policy concerning vacations and sick leave for judges and nonjudicial officers of the courts;

(10)  establish uniform hours for court sessions throughout the state and may, with the consent of the presiding officer of the Judicial Council, call and appoint justices or judges of courts of record to serve temporarily as Court of Appeals, district court, or juvenile court judges and set reasonable compensation for their services;

(11)  when necessary for administrative reasons, change the county for trial of any case if no party to the litigation files timely objections to this change;

(12)  organize and administer a program of continuing education for judges and support staff, including training for justice court judges;

(13)  provide for an annual meeting for each level of the courts of record, and the annual judicial conference; and

(14)  perform other duties as assigned by the presiding officer of the council.

